Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article VII Health, Education and Welfare

Section 1. Public Education.

The legislature shall by general law establish and maintain a system of public schools open to all children of the State, and may provide for other public educational institutions. Schools and institutions so established shall be free from sectarian control. No money shall be paid from public funds for the direct benefit of any religious or other private educational institution.

Editor’s notes. —

The amendment proposed by HJR 73 am S (1976) (direct financial aid to students) was rejected by voters.

Opinions of attorney general. —

There is neither constitutional nor statutory prohibition to the exercise of discretion by the commissioner of education, or by the respective school district authorities, in allowing secular and religious organizations to rent school buildings during nonschool hours. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

This section would apply only in those cases where the school districts are providing a direct benefit to a religious or private institution by rental of school buildings during nonschool hours. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

If the rate for religious groups renting a school building during nonschool hours is substantially lower than the rate for secular groups, the difference would be a gift of school property resulting in a “direct benefit” and would be an improper use of money raised by taxation. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

Borough funds are clearly “public funds” within the meaning of these constitutional provisions. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Secondary education fund created by ordinance in a borough constituted an appropriation of public funds expended for direct benefit of a private education institution. 1980 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 6.

Section 2. State University.

The University of Alaska is hereby established as the state university and constituted a body corporate. It shall have title to all real and personal property now or hereafter set aside for or conveyed to it. Its property shall be administered and disposed of according to law.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The University of Alaska is similar in all or most respects to other state executive agencies for purposes of budgeting and accounting; it does not have any peculiar status by virtue of being constitutionally established. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The university’s budget can be made subject to line item appropriations by the legislature to the same extent that the budget for the rest of the executive branch of government is subject to line item appropriations. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The legislature can make appropriations to the university using different budget units than those requested by the board of regents to the same extent that it can make appropriations for executive branch activities using different budget units than those requested by the governor. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 3. Board of Regents.

The University of Alaska shall be governed by a board of regents. The regents shall be appointed by the governor, subject to confirmation by a majority of the members of the legislature in joint session. The board shall, in accordance with law, formulate policy and appoint the president of the university. He shall be the executive officer of the board.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The University of Alaska is an instrumentality of the state, and membership on its Board of Regents is necessarily an office under the state. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

Membership on the Board of Regents by a governor, legislator or judge offends the prohibition against dual office holding. December 27, 1976 Op. Att’y Gen.

The University of Alaska is similar in all or most respects to other state executive agencies for purposes of budgeting and accounting; it does not have any peculiar status by virtue of being constitutionally established. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The university’s budget can be made subject to line item appropriations by the legislature to the same extent that the budget for the rest of the executive branch of government is subject to line item appropriations. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

The legislature can make appropriations to the university using different budget units than those requested by the board of regents to the same extent that it can make appropriations for executive branch activities using different budget units than those requested by necessary governor. February 28, 1977 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 4. Public Health.

The legislature shall provide for the promotion and protection of public health.

Cross references. —

See note to Alaska Const., art. VII, § 5.

Section 5. Public Welfare.

The legislature shall provide for public welfare.